Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 3. Alaska Public Broadcasting Commission.

Cross references. —

For findings and purpose of the 1981 order amending several provisions of this article, see § 1, E.O. No. 50 (1981) in the Executive Orders pamphlet.

Administrative Code. —

For public broadcasting commission, see 2 AAC 55.

Sec. 44.21.256.
Creation of Alaska Public Broadcasting Commission.

There is created within the Department of Administration the Alaska Public Broadcasting Commission.

History.

(§ 1 ch 153 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 87 SLA 1976; am E.O. No. 50, § 2 (1981))

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.58.010. Renumbered in 1981.

Sec. 44.21.258.
Membership and term of office.

The commission consists of nine members appointed by the governor, without regard to political affiliation, subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session. In making appointments to the commission, the governor shall give due consideration to representation from such fields as higher education, elementary and secondary education, communications, commercial broadcasting, public health, public works, labor, commerce, and the professions. Members may be removed only for cause.

The members of the commission shall serve staggered terms of five years.

History.

(§ 1 ch 153 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 87 SLA 1976; am § 31 ch 168 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.58.020. Renumbered in 1981.

Sec. 44.21.260.
Compensation and expenses.

Members of the commission receive no salary, but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized by law for other commissions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 153 SLA 1970)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.58.030. Renumbered in 1981.

Cross references. —

For per diem and travel expenses, see AS

39.20.180

.

Sec. 44.21.262.
Chairman.

At the first meeting, the commission shall elect a chairman from among its members to serve for one year. A chairman may be elected and serve for more than one consecutive term.

History.

(§ 1 ch 153 SLA 1970)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.58.040. Renumbered in 1981.

Sec. 44.21.264.
Purpose of the commission.

The commission is created to encourage and supervise the development of an integrated public broadcasting system for the state and for the coordination of all public broadcasting stations.
The primary purpose of the commission is the encouragement and support of noncommercial public broadcasting in the state through the provision of operating and capital grants in support of the delivery of noncommercial programs intended for a general audience by locally controlled nonprofit broadcast stations or telecommunications entities. The commission may support stations and entities that also engage in the delivery of instructional, for-credit programs, and the commission may provide funds for those purposes, but the primary purpose of commission funds is the support of activities that result in the delivery of general audience, noncommercial material.

History.

(§ 1 ch 153 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 87 SLA 1976; am E.O. No. 50, § 3 (1981))

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.58.050. Renumbered in 1981.

Administrative Code. —

For public broadcasting commission, see 2 AAC 55.

Sec. 44.21.266.
Duties of the commission.

The commission shall

apply for federal and private funds for public broadcasting purposes and receive all federal, state, or private funds, property, or assistance that may be appropriated, granted, or otherwise made available to the commission for public broadcasting purposes, and use and disburse funds and property for purposes consistent with the terms of AS

44.21.256

—

44.21.290

, subject to reasonable limitations imposed by the grantor;

provide consultative services in all aspects of public broadcasting to all public or private agencies in the state that request them;

serve as a library and clearinghouse for public broadcasting information;

through grants to qualified entities, develop an integrated public broadcasting network for the state;

through grants to qualified entities, develop and distribute public broadcasting programming in the state;

prepare and submit to the governor and the legislature, in compliance with the state information systems plan adopted by the commissioner of administration, a long-term plan for the development of public broadcasting stations and systems in the state, and biennially update the plan; and

perform all other functions necessary to ensure the orderly and coordinated development of public broadcasting in the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 153 SLA 1970; am §§ 4, 7 ch 87 SLA 1976; am E.O. No. 50, § 4 (1981); am § 8 ch 53 SLA 1987; am § 7 ch 134 SLA 1990; am E.O. No. 113 § 13 (2005))

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.58.060. Renumbered in 1981.

Administrative Code. —

For public broadcasting commission, see 2 AAC 55.

Sec. 44.21.268.
Powers of the commission.

The commission may

employ all consultative, technical and clerical personnel necessary for the implementation of AS

44.21.256

—

44.21.290

, within the limits of available funds;

employ a director, who shall be directly responsible to the commission in financial and administrative matters;

provide grants to locally controlled non-profit telecommunications entities which lease, purchase, construct, own, operate and manage and are the licensees of public broadcasting stations, production centers, and other related equipment and facilities for the production and transmission of open circuit, closed circuit, 2,500 megahertz, and other transmission means necessary to provide fully effective public broadcasting in the state;

appoint unpaid advisory committees to assist in development of programs for public television broadcasts;

provide assistance to licensed commercial broadcasting stations for the broadcast of public affairs programming.

In performing its duties and exercising its authority under AS

44.21.256

—

44.21.290

, the commission may not exercise control over the specific content or airing of any program material.

History.

(§ 1 ch 153 SLA 1970; am § 5 ch 87 SLA 1976; am E.O. No. 50, § 5 (1981))

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.58.070. Renumbered in 1981.

Administrative Code. —

For public broadcasting commission, see 2 AAC 55.

Sec. 44.21.270.
Commercial broadcasting.

Nothing in AS

44.21.256

—

44.21.290

may be construed to restrict or control commercial broadcast stations or companies operating or licensed in the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 153 SLA 1970)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.58.080. Renumbered in 1981.

Sec. 44.21.290.
Definitions.

In AS

44.21.256

—

44.21.290

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“commission” means the Alaska Public Broadcasting Commission;

“public broadcasting” includes, but is not limited to, television and radio transmission by 2,500 megahertz, closed circuit or microwave video and audio programming, slow-scan television programming, programming via satellite, teletype or facsimile transmission, and distribution methods, when the transmission, programming, and distribution are intended to serve a noncommercial public purpose.

History.

(§ 1 ch 153 SLA 1970; am § 6 ch 87 SLA 1976; am E.O. No. 50, § 6 (1981))

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.58.090. Renumbered in 1981.

Administrative Code. —

For public broadcasting commission, see 2 AAC 55.